North Carolina statutes. Chapter 160A. Cities and Towns.
Article 2. General Corporate Powers.

§ 160A-11.
Corporate powers.

The inhabitants of each city heretofore or hereafter incorporated by act of the General Assembly or by the Municipal Board of Control shall be and remain a municipal corporation by the name specified in the city charter. Under that name they shall be vested with all of the property and rights in property belonging to the corporation; shall have perpetual succession; may sue and be sued; may contract and be contracted with; may acquire and hold any property, real and personal, devised, sold, or in any manner conveyed, dedicated to, or otherwise acquired by them, and from time to time may hold, invest, sell, or dispose of the same; may have a common seal and alter and renew the same at will; and shall have and may exercise in conformity with the city charter and the general laws of this State all municipal powers, functions, rights, privileges, and immunities of every name and nature whatsoever.

All documents required or permitted by law to be executed by municipal corporations will be legally valid and binding in this respect when a legible corporate stamp, which is a facsimile of its seal, is used in lieu of an imprinted or embossed corporate or common seal.

History.

Code, ss. 704, 3117; 1901, c. 283; 1905, c. 526; Rev., s. 2916; 1907, c. 978; P.L. 1917, c. 223; C.S., s. 2623; Ex. Sess. 1921, c. 58; 1927, c. 14; 1933, c. 69; 1949, c. 938; 1955, c. 77; 1959, c. 391; 1961, c. 308; 1967, c. 100, s. 2; c. 1122, s. 1; 1969, c. 944; 1971, c. 698, s. 1; 1973, c. 170; c. 426, s. 7; 2011-284, s. 110.

Cross References.

As to construction of grants of power to municipalities, see

G.S. 160A-4

.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-284, s. 110, effective June 24, 2011, deleted “bequeathed” following “devised” in the middle of the first paragraph.

Legal Periodicals.

For note on abrogation of contractual sovereign immunity, see 12 Wake Forest L. Rev. 1082 (1976).

§ 160A-12.
Exercise of corporate power.

All powers, functions, rights, privileges, and immunities of the corporation shall be exercised by the city council and carried into execution as provided by the charter or the general law. A power, function, right, privilege, or immunity that is conferred or imposed by charter or general law without directions or restrictions as to how it is to be exercised or performed shall be carried into execution as provided by ordinance or resolution of the city council.

History.

Code, s. 703; Rev., s. 2917; C.S., s. 2624; 1971, c. 698, s. 1.

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

EDITOR’S NOTE.—

Many of the opinions cited below were decided under former similar provisions.

§§ 160A-13 through 160A-15.

Reserved for future codification purposes.